Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.125

Secured claim—Creditor's right.

If a creditor's claim is secured by any property of the decedent, this chapter does not affect the right of the creditor to realize on the creditor's security, whether or not the creditor presented the claim in the manner provided in RCW 11.42.070.

[ 1997 c 252 s 37.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.